<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR89509-0104 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.5-09-89.f2.A1103</DOCID><TEXT><ITAG tagnum="69"><ITAG tagnum="52">Privacy Act of 1974; Systems of Records</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>National Archives and Records Administration (NARA).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Notice of Revised Systems of Records.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>NARA is making various minor changes to its systems ofrecords, and proposing to alter two systems and delete another system.The specific changes to the notices are set forth in the SupplementaryInformation section, followed by the inventory of NARA systems notices,as amended, published in full.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>DATES: </T2>Written comments on the two proposed altered systems (NARA-5and NARA-11) should be received by June 8, 1989. All other changes to thesystems will be effective on June 8, 1989. NARA filed an Altered SystemReport with the Congress and the Office of Management and Budget on April26, 1989. The proposed altered systems shall be effective without furthernotice on June 26, 1989, unless comments are received which would resultin a contrary determination.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESS: </T2>Comments on the proposed altered systems should be addressedto John A. Constance, Director, Policy and Program Analysis Division (NAA),National Archives and Records Administration, Washington, DC 20408.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2>John A. Constance or LaurencePatlen, Policy and Program Analysis Division (NAA), National Archives andRecords Administration, Washington, DC 20408. Telephone (202) 523-3214or (FTS) 523-3214.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2>As required by the Privacy Act of 1974,and Office of Management and Budget (OMB) Circular No. A-130, the NationalArchives and Records Administration (NARA) reviewed its systems of recordsand identified two systems of records requiring substantive modification,as well as numerous minor administrative and editorial changes that willmore accurately describe these records. One system, NARA 21, OPM GovernmentwideNotices, is being deleted. NARA last gave complete notice of its inventoryof systems of records in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> of March 7, 1986 (51 FR 8148).Most of these changes are the result of reorganizations and office relocations.Included are changes to office names, names and addresses of system managers,locations of the records, and retention and disposal instructions. Severalchanges are applicable to all NARA systems. Wherever used, the term ``NationalArchives Center'' has been changed to the terms ``Federal Records Centers''and/or ``the Regional Archives.'' Wherever used, the term ``National ArchivesField Branches'' has been replaced with the term ``the Regional Archives.''For NARA-1, Researcher Application Files, the Federal Records Centers andNational Personnel Records Center are deleted as locations since the recordsare not retained there. The retention period has been changed to 25 years.The retention period for NARA-2, Reference Request Files created in theprocess of providing records to researchers in the research rooms has alsobeen changed to 25 years.For NARA-5, Conference and Related Activities files, the Categories ofIndividuals Covered by the System is expanded to include participants orpotential participants in ``training courses offered or sponsored by NARA.''The Categories of Records description is begin modified to include ``copiesof training requests (SF-182 or equivalent).'' At certain locations, itis expedient to maintain training request information in addition to ``biographicalinformation'' presently covered by the notice. This proposed change willexpand the categories of records in NARA-5. These proposals are major changesfor which an Altered System Report has been submitted to Congress and OMB.Minor changes are being made to add 601 D Street NW, Washington, DC asa location, and add the Assistant Archivist for Records Administrationas a system manager.For NARA-11, Credentials, Passes and Licenses, the categories of individualscovered by the system is proposed to be expanded to include contractorsto NARA. This is a major change for which an Altered Systems Reprot hasbeen submitted to the Congress and OMB. Minor changes to NARA-11 are madeto delete Optional Form 55, U.S. Government Identification, from the Categoriesof Records since the form is not maintained, and the Retention and Disposalsection is updated to clarify the various disposal instructions for therecords.For NARA-14, Payroll and Time and Attendance Reporting System, referenceto the Personnel Information Resources System (PIRS) under System Location,is deleted. This automated system is covered by the Office of PersonnelManagment Governmentwide system notice OPM/GOVT-1. Because NARA-14 is maintainedunder a reimbursable agreement with the General Services Administration(GSA), the System Manager and Address is changed from the Director, PersonnelServices Division, NARA, to the Chief, National Payroll Center (6BCY-N),P.O. Box 419277, Kansas City, MO 64141. The Notification Procedure andRecords Access Procedure are changed in the same manner. NARA employeesmay continue to obtain information or request access from their supervisor.For NARA-15, Editorial Freelance Vendor File, the System Manager and Address,and Record Access Procedure sections are modified to add the Chief, ArchivalPublications Staff, Office of the National Archives (NN-E) as a systemmanager. For NARA-16, Library Circulation Files, the name of the organizationresponsible for the system has been changed to Reference Services Branchto reflect a recent reorganization. The location of the records has beenmodified to include the Washington National Records Center.For NARA-17, Grievance Records, the last sentence in Categories of Recordsis rewritten for clarification to read ``This system also includes filesand records of grievances filed under the negotiated grievance procedures.''For NARA 19, Workers Compensation Case Files, the System Location is revisedto indicate location in the Employee and Labor Relations Branch (NAPL),as well as administrative offices. The System Manager and Address is revisedto indicate the Chief, Employee and Labor Relations Branch (NAPL) for theWashington, DC area and administrative officers for field locations.For NARA 20, Reviewer/Consultant File, the location of the system has beenchanged to the National Archives Building, Washington, DC. The NationalHistorical Publications and Records Commission, which is responsible forthe records, has been relocated there.NARA 21, OPM Governmentwide Notices is deleted because this notice describesnotices issued by Office of Personnel Management (OPM). Although OPM Governmentwidesystems are maintained by NARA, the notification, access and amendmentprocedures for these systems are only governed by OPM rules. Therefore,it is unnecessary to publish them as NARA systems.In NARA 23, Investigation Case Files, the routine uses section is clarifiedto indicate the existing purposes of the routine uses: making determinationsresulting from authorized investigations and documenting such investigations.Two system managers and locations are being added: The Director, LegalServices Staff (NSL) and the Inspector General (NG). The safeguards arerevised to indicate the minimum procedures in effect at the three locations.Also, the addresses and locations in the appendix are revised to reflectthe latest organizational change, relocations and editorial corrections.Except as indicated for NARA 5, and NARA 11 above, none of these changesalter the purposes for which the systems were created, nor do they constitutemajor changes requiring New or Altered Systems Reports under the PrivacyAct or OMB Circular No. A-130.<ITAG tagnum="21">Dated: May 1, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Don W. Wilson,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Archivist of the United States.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="75">National Archives and Records Administration (NARA) Privacy Act Noticeof Systems</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">NARA 1. Researcher Application Files.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">NARA 2. Reference Request Files.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">NARA 3. Donors of Historical Materials Files.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">NARA 4. National Archives Committees Files.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">NARA 5. Conference and Related Activities Files.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">NARA 6. Mailing List Files.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">NARA 7. Mandatory Review of Classified Documents Request Files andFreedom of Information Act Request Files.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">NARA 8. Restricted and Classified Records Access Authorization Files.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">NARA 9. Authors Files.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">NARA 10. Employee Drug Abuse/Alcoholism Files.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">NARA 11. Credentials, Passes, and Licenses.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">NARA 12. Emergency Notification Roster and Files.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">NARA 13. Defunct Agency Records.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">NARA 14. Payroll and Time and Attendance Reporting System.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">NARA 15. Editorial Freelance Vendor File.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">NARA 16. Library Circulation Files.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">NARA 17. Grievance Records.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">NARA 18. General Law Files.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">NARA 19. Workers Compensation Case Files.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">NARA 20. Reviewer/Consultant File.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">NARA 22. Employee Related Files.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">NARA 23. Investigation Case Files.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">NARA 24. Personnel Security Files.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="66">NARA 1</ITAG>System name:Researcher Application Files.System location:This system of records is located in the National Archives Building, theRegional Archives, and the Presidential Libraries. The addresses are listedin the appendix following the NARA Notices.Categories of individuals covered by the system:Researchers who apply to use records in the National Archives, the RegionalArchives, and the Presidential Libraries.Categories of records in the system:Applications to use records including name, address, telephone number,occupation, research topic, educational level, and field of interest.Authority for maintenance of the system:44 U.S.C. 2108, 2203(f)(1), and 2907.Routine uses of records maintained in the system, including categoriesof users and the purposes of such uses:The records are used by employees of NARA who have a need for the recordsin the performance of their duties to identify and record the individualswho use records in the National Archives and other repositories listedabove, to provide a means of contacting the individual if additional informationof research interest to him or her is found, and to mail notices of eventsand programs of interest to users of the records in the National Archives.The routine use statements A, F, and G, described in the appendix followingthe NARA Notices, also apply to this system of records.Policies and practices for storing, retrieving, accessing, retaining, anddisposing of records in the system:Storage:Paper records in card files and file folders.Retrievability:Filed alphabetically at each location by name of individual.Safeguards:During normal hours of operation, records are maintained in areas accessibleonly to authorized personnel of NARA. After hours, buildings have securityguards and/or doors are secured and all entrances are monitored by electronicsurveillance equipment.Retention and disposal:Records are cut off annually, held one year, and retired. They are destroyedwhen 25 years old. These procedures are in accordance with the NARA RecordsMaintenance and Disposition Manual.System manager(s) and address:NARA officials with responsibility for this geographically dispersed systemof records are the Assistant Archivist for the National Archives at theNational Archives Building, the directors of the Presidential Libraries,and the directors of the Regional Archives. The address for these locationsare listed in the appendix following the NARA Notices.Notification procedure:Information may be obtained from the officials cited above at the appropriaterepository where individuals have used records.Record access procedures:Requests for these records should be addressed to the Assistant Archivistfor the National Archives, the directors of the Presidential Libraries,or the directors of the Regional Archives, depending on where individualshave used records. In-person requests may be made during business hourslisted for each location in the appendix following the NARA Notices. Forwritten requests, the individual should provide full name, address, andtelephone number, and the approximate dates records were used. For personalvisits, individuals should be able to provide some acceptable identification,such as a driver's license or student or employee identification. Onlygeneral inquiries may be made by telephone.Contesting record procedures:NARA rules for contesting the contents and appealing initial determiantionsare found in 36 CFR 1202.Record source categories:Researchers.<ITAG tagnum="66">NARA 2</ITAG>System name:Reference Request Files.System location:This system of records is located in the National Archives Building, theNational Audiovisual Center, the Presidential Libraries, the WashingtonNational Records Center, the Federal Records Centers, the National PersonnelRecords Center, and the Regional Archives. The addresses are listed inthe appendix following the NARA Notices.Categories of individuals covered by the system:Researchers and correspondents requesting information from the recordsin the National Archives, the National Audiovisual Center, PresidentialLibraries, the Washington National Records Center, the Federal RecordsCenters, the National Personnel Records Center and the Regional Archives.categories of records in the system:Correspondence, reference slips, receipts for money, deposit account records,reproduction orders, reference logs, lending files, and reference filespertaining to requests for information, including all or parts of the following:Requester's name, address, telephone number, occupation, research topic,educational level, and field of interest.authority for maintenance of the system:44 U.S.C. 2108, 2203(f)(2), and 2907.routine uses of records maintained in the system, including categoriesof users and the purposes of such uses:The records are used by employees of NARA who have a need for the recordsin the performance of their duties to record requests for information andthe responses to those requests; to maintain control over information requestsreceived and answered; to enable later contact with the requester if required;to assist in the preparation of standard replies to similar questions;to facilitate preparation of statistical and other reports; to maintaincontrol of records being used; to establish researcher accountability forrecords; to record payment for reproduction orders and funds placed ondeposit; to record loans of materials or records from the above locations;and, when requested by a researcher, to write recommendations for researchersfor grants or employment. The routine use statements A, F, and G, describedin the appendix following the NARA Notices, also apply to this system ofrecords.policies and practices for storing, retrieving, accessing, retaining, anddisposing of records in the system:storage:Paper records in card files and file folders.retrievability:The records within this system are primarily retrieved by name.safeguards:During normal working hours of operation, records are maintained in areasaccessible only to authorized personnel of NARA. After hours, buildingshave security guards an/or doors are secured and all entrances are monitoredby electronic surveillance equipment.retention and disposal:Records which are:(1) Created in the administration of loans are cut off after the returnof the materials, held one year, and destroyed.(2) Created in the process of providing reference service by mail are cutoff annually, held two years, and destroyed.(3) Created in the process of providing records to researchers in NationalArchives research rooms are cut off annually, held one year and retired.They are destroyed when 25 years old.These procedures are in accordance with the NARA Records Maintenance andDisposition Manual.system manager(s) and address:Depending on where the records are located, the system managers are theAssistant Archivist for the National Archives, the Director of the NationalAudiovisual Center, the directors of the Presidential Libraries, the directorof the Washington National Records Center, the directors of the FederalRecords Center, the director of the National Personnel Records Center andthe directors of the Regional Archives, at the addresses listed for theselocations in the appendix following the NARA Notices.notification procedure:Information may be obtained from the officials listed above at the appropriaterepository where individuals have used records or directed inquiries. Theaddresses are listed in the appendix following the NARA Notices.record access procedure:Requests for these records should be addressed to the Assistant Archivistfor the National Archives, the Director of the National Audiovisual Center,the directors of the Presidential Libraries, the director of the WashingtonNational Records Center, the directors of the Federal Records Center, thedirector of the National Personnel Records Center or the directors of theRegional Archives, depending on where individuals used records or directedinquiries. In-person requests may be made during normal business hourslisted for each location in the appendix following the NARA notices. Forwritten requests, provide full name, address, telephone number, and theapproximate dates of the correspondence or transaction. For personal visits,individuals should be able to provide some acceptable identification, suchas a driver's license or student or employee identification. Only generalinquiries may be made by telephone.contesting record procedures:NARA rules for contesting the contents and appealing initial determinationsare found in 36 CFR Part 1202.record source categories:Researchers, correspondents, and employees of the National Archives.<ITAG tagnum="66">NARA 3</ITAG>System name:Donors of Historical Materials Files.system location:This system of records is located in the National Archives Building andthe Presidential Libraries. The addresses are listed in the appendix followingthe NARA Notices.categories of individuals covered by the system:Donors and potential donors of papers or other historical materials tothe National Archives and Presidential Libraries.categories of records in the system:Correspondence, deeds of gift, deposit agreements, accession files, accessioncards, administrative files, inventories of museum objects, oral historyuse agreements, tapes, and transcripts, all of which are related to thesolicitation and preservation of donations. Also included are biographicaldata on donors as well as their addresses, telephone numbers, and occupations.Authority for maintenance of the system:44 U.S.C. 2111 and 2112.Routine uses of records maintained in the system, including categoriesof users and the purposes of such uses:The records are used by employees of NARA who have a need for the recordsin the performance of their duties primarily to record solicitation effortsand accessioning of papers and other historical materials for preservationin the above locations; to maintain control over the accessions program;to facilitate future solicitations of gifts; to record deeds of gift; andto record agreements of use. The routine uses of records also include releasingbiographical material about donors and prospective donors to the publicas well as the routine use statements A, F, and G, described in the appendixfollowing the NARA Notices.Policies and practices for storing, retrieving, accessing, retaining, anddisposing of records in the system:Storage:Paper records in file folders; sound recordings.Retrievability:Filed alphabetically at each location by name of donor.Safeguards:Buildings have security guards, and records and other materials are maintainedin areas accessible only to authorized personnel of NARA.Retention and disposal:Records are permanent, in accordance with the NARA Records Maintenanceand Disposition Manual.System manager(s) and address:Depending on where the records are maintained the system managers are theAssistant Archivist for the National Archives and the Assistant Archivistfor Presidential Libraries at the National Archives Building, and the directorsof the Presidential Libraries. The addresses are listed in the appendixfollowing the NARA Notices.Notification procedure:Information may be obtained from the officials listed above at the appropriaterepository where individuals have donated materials or from which theyhave received requests for donations. The addresses are listed in the appendixfollowing the NARA Notices.Record access procedures:Requests for these records should be addressed to the Assistant Archivistfor the National Archives, the Assistant Archivist for Presidential Libraries,or a director of a Presidential Library depending on which repository theindividual has been associated with. In-person requests may be made duringnormal business hours listed for each location in the appendix followingthe NARA Notices. For written requests, provide full name, address, telephonenumber, and the approximate dates of the correspondence or transaction.For personal visits individuals should be able to provide some acceptableidentification such as a driver's license or employee identification card.Only general inquiries may be made by telephone.Contesting record procedures:NARA rules for contesting the contents and appealing initial determinationsare found in 36 CFR Part 1202.Record source categories:Donors, potential donors, and employees of the National Archives.<ITAG tagnum="66">NARA 4</ITAG>System name:National Archives Committees Files.System location:This system of records is located in the National Archives building, 7thand Pennsylvania Avenue, NW., Washington, DC.Categories of individuals covered by the system:Former, current, and prospective advisory committee members.Categories of records in the system:Correspondence with and biographical information about former, current,and prospective advisory committee members including all or parts of thefollowing: name, address, telephone number, education, professional vita,and publications.Authority for maintenance of the system:44 U.S.C. 2104(f).Routine uses of records maintained in the system, including categoriesof users and the purposes of such uses:The records are used by employees of NARA who have a need for these recordsin the performance of their duties to review professional qualificationsof prospective committee members; to document activities of the committeesthemselves: to serve as a mailing list of current and past members; torecord the comittee members' role; and to help formulate advisory committeepolicy. Biographical material relating to advisory committee members ismade available to the public for purposes of publicizing the membershipand activities of the committees. The routine use statement F, describedin the appendix following the NARA Notices, also applies to this systemof records.Policies and practices for storing, retrieving, accessing, retaining, anddisposing of records in the system:Storage:Paper records in file folders.Retrievability:Filed alphabetically by name of individual.Safeguards:During normal hours of operation, records are maintained in areas accessibleonly to authorized personnel of NARA. After hours, the building has securityguards and/or doors are secured and all entrances are monitored by electronicsurveillance equipment.Retention and disposal:These records are cut off after each meeting, held five years, and offeredto the National Archieves. These procedures are in accordance with theNARA Records Maintenance and Disposition Manual.System manager(s) and address:The NARA official with overall responsibility for the system records isthe Assistant Archivist for Management and Administration (NA), NationalArchives Building, 7th and Pennsylvania Avenue, NW., Washington, DC.Notification procedure:Information may be obtained from the official listed above at the addresslisted above.Record access procedures:Requests for these records should be addressed to the Assistant Archivistfor Management and Administration (NA). In-person requests may be madeduring normal business hours listed in the appendix, following the NARANotices. For written requests, provide full name, address, telephone number,and if applicable, dates of service. For personal visits, individuals shouldbe able to provide some acceptable identification, such as a driver's licenseor employee identification card. Only general inquiries may be made bytelephone.Contesting record procedures:NARA rules for contesting the contents and appealing initial determinationsare found in 36 CFR Part 1202.Record source categories:Former, current, and prospective advisory committee members, associatesof committee members, and employees of the National Achives.<ITAG tagnum="66">NARA 5</ITAG>System name: Conference and Related Activities Files.System location: This system of records is located in the National Archives Building; theOffice of Records Administration at 601 D Street, NW., Washington, DC;Presidential Libraries; Washington National Records Center; Federal RecordsCenters; National Personnel Records Center; and the Regional Archives.The addresses are listed in the appendix following the NARA Notices.Categories of individuals covered by the system:Participants or potential participants in symposia, conferences, lectures,and training courses offered or sponsored by NARA.Categories of records in the system:Biographical information about individuals involved in these activitiesincluding name, address, telephone number, area of expertise, researchinterest, occupation, education, and publications. Also, copies of trainingrequests (SF-182 or equivalent).Authority for maintenance of the system:44 U.S.C. 2104, 2109, and 2204.Routine uses of records maintained in the system, including categoriesof users and the purposes of such uses:The records are used by employees of NARA who have a need for the recordsin the performance of their duties in the various archival programs indicatedabove; to provide a record of previous activities; to promote the use ofarchival materials; to provide mailing lists; to facilitate publicationof the activity's proceedings; and to register persons attending the activity.The routine use statement F, described in the appendix following the NARANotices, also applies to this system of records.Policies and practices for storing, retrieving, accessing, retaining, anddisposing of records in the system:Storage:Paper records in card files and file folders.Retrievability: Filed alphabetically at each location by name of individual.Safeguards:During normal hours of operations, records are maintained in areas accessibleonly to authorized personnel of NARA. After hours, buildings have securityguards and/or doors are secured and all entrances are monitored by electronicsurveillance equipment.Retention and disposal:These records are cut off after the event, held for one year, and destroyed.These procedures are in accordance with the NARA Records Maintenance andDisposition Manual.System manager(s) and address:NARA officials with responsibility for this geographically dispersed systemof records are the Assistant Archivist for the National Archives and theAssistant Archivist for Public Programs at the National Archives Building,the Assistant Archivist for Records Administration at 601 D Street, NW.,Washington, DC; the directors of the Presidential Libraries; the directorof the Washington National Records Center; the directors of the FederalRecords Centers; the director of the National Personnel Records Center;and the directors of the Regional Archives at the addresses listed in theappendix following the NARA Notices.Notification procedure:Information may be obtained from the officials listed above at the appropriatelocation which sponsored the activity which the individual attended orin which he or she participated. The addresses are listed in the appendixfollowing the NARA Notices.Record access procedures:Requests for these records should be addressed to the Assistant Archivistfor the National Archives; the Assistant Archivist for Public Programs;the Assistant Archivist for Records Administration; the directors of thePresidential Libraries; the director of the Washington National RecordsCenter; the directors of the Federal Records Centers; the director of theNational Personnel Records Center; or the directors of the Regional Archives.In-person requests may be made during normal working hours listed for eachlocation in the appendix following the NARA Notices. For written requests,provide full name, address, telephone number, and the dates of activity.For personal visits, provide some acceptable identification, such as adriver's license or an employee identification card. Only general inquiriesmay be made by telephone.Contesting record procedures:NARA rules for contesting the contents and appealing initial determinationsare found in 36 CFR Part 1202.Record source categories:Participants, attendees, and employees of the National Archives.<ITAG tagnum="66">NARA 6</ITAG>System name:Mailing List Files.System location:This system of records is located in the National Archives Building, PresidentialLibraries, National Audiovisual Center, and the Regional Archives. Theaddresses are listed in the appendix following the NARA Notices.Categories of individuals covered by the system:Researchers; buyers of NARA products and those making inquiries or receivingprice quotations on possible orders; tourists; government officials; professionalcolleagues; professionals in related fields, such as librarians and teachers;and others with an interest in National Archives activities.Categories of records in the system:Mailing lists include primarily the individual's name and address. Somelists also include telephone number, title, occupation, and institutionalaffiliation. Some mailing lists include type and subject of materials purchased,date purchased, and dollar value.Authority for maintenance of the system:44 U.S.C. 2109, 2112, 2307, 2902, and 2904.Routine uses of records maintained in the system, including categoriesof users and the purposes of such uses:The mailing lists are used by employees of NARA who have a need for therecords in the performance of their duties, to address newsletters, announcements,programs, and material about special events; to bill researchers for reproductionorders; and to mail press releases and other information. On occasion themailing lists are donated to or exchanged with private and public organizationsto further scholarship and NARA programs. The routine use statement F,described in the appendix following the NARA Notices, also applies to thissystem of records.Policies and practices for storing, retrieving, accessing, retaining, anddisposing of records in the system:Storage:Paper records in card files, index cards, address plates, magnetic cards,punch cards, cassettes, and magnetic tape.Retrievability:Filed alphabetically at each location by name of individual.Safeguards:During normal hours of operation, these records are maintained in areasaccessible only to authorized personnel of NARA. After hours, buildingshave security guards and/or doors are secured and all entrances are monitoredby electronic surveillance equipment.Retention and disposal: These mailing lists are reviewed annually and updated. Outdated informationis purged. These procedures are in accordance with the NARA Records Maintenanceand Disposition Manual. System manager(s) and address: Officials responsible for this geographically dispersed system of recordsare the Assistant Archivist for Management and Administration, the AssistantArchivist for the National Archives, the Assistant Archivist for the PresidentialLibraries, and the Assistant Archivist for Public Programs at the NationalArchives Building, and the Assistant Archivist for Records Administrationat 601 D Street, NW., Washington, DC. Other officials are directors ofthe Presidential Libraries, and the directors of the Regional Archives.The addresses for these locations are listed in the appendix followingthe NARA Notices. Notification procedure: Information may be obtained from the officials cited above at the appropriatelocation in which the individual has expressed an interest or in whichhe or she has a potential interest. The addresses are listed in the appendixfollowing the NARA Notices. Record access procedures: Requests from individuals to access records should be addressed to theAssistant Archivist for Management and Administration, the Assistant Archivistfor the National Archives, the Assistant Archivist for Presidential Libraries,the Assistant Archivist for Public Programs, the Assistant Archivist forRecords Administration, the directors of the Presidential Libraries, orthe directors of the Regional Archives, depending on which NARA activitymaintains the specific records. In-person requests may be made during normalbusiness hours listed for each location in the appendix following the NARANotices. For written requests, provide full name, address, and telephonenumber, and the approximate date of communications with the repository.For personal visits, individuals should be able to provide some acceptableidentification, such as a driver's license or employee identification card.Only general inquiries may be made by telephone.Contesting record procedures: NARA rules for contesting the contents and appealing initial determinationsare found in 36 CFR Part 1202. Record source categories: Individuals expressing an interest in Archives activities and NARA employees.<ITAG tagnum="66">NARA 7</ITAG>System name: Mandatory Review of Classified Documents Request Files and Freedom of InformationAct Request Files. System location: This system of records is located in the National Archives Building, PresidentialLibraries, Washigton National Records Center, Federal Records Centers,and the Regional Archives. The addresses are listed in the appendix followingthe NARA Notices. Categories of individuals covered by the system: Researchers requesting mandatory review of security classified documentsand requesting records under the Freedom of Information Act. Categories of records in the system: Requests for records under the Freedom of Information Act include requestor'sname, address, and material requested. Requests for mandatory review ofclassified documents include requestor's name, address, telephone number,occupation, employer, and research topic. Authority for maintenance of the system: Executive Order 12356, April 2, 1982 (3 CFR, 1982 Comp., p. 166) and 5U.S.C. 552, as amended. Routine uses of records maintained in the system, including categoriesof users and the purposes of such uses: The records are used by employees of NARA who have a need for the recordsin the performance of their duties to record requests for access to security-classifiedrecords and requests to obtain records under the Freedom of InformationAct; to record the status of each request; to record actions taken on requests,and to compile information for statistical reports. Records in this systemmay be made available for access review to the agency that created thedocuments requested under the Freedom of Information Act or a MandatoryReview request. The routine use statements A, F, and G, described in theappendix following the NARA Notices, also apply to this system of records.Policies and practices for storing, retrieving, accessing, retaining, anddisposing of records in the system:  Storage: Paper records in card files and file folders. Retrievability: Filed alphabetically at each location by name of individual. Safeguards: During normal hours of operation, these records are maintained in areasaccessible only to authorized personnel of NARA. After hours, buildingshave security guards and/or doors are secured and all entrances are monitoredby electronic surveillance equipment. Retention and disposal: Records are cut off annually, held one year, and retired. They are subsequentlydestroyed in accordance with the NARA Records Maintenance and DispositionManual. System manager(s) and address: NARA officials with responsibility for this geographically dispersed systemof records are the Assistant Archivist for the National Archives and theAssistant Archivist for Management and Administration at the National ArchivesBuilding, the directors of the Presidential Libraries, the director ofthe Washington National Records Center, the directors of the Federal RecordsCenters, and the directors of the Regional Archives, at the addresses listedfor these locations in the appendix following the NARA Notices. Notification procedure: Information may be obtained from the officials listed above at the appropriaterepository where individuals have requested mandatory review of classifiedrecords or have requested records under the Freedom of Information Act.The addresses are listed in the appendix following the NARA Notices.Record access procedures: Requests for these records should be addressed to the Assistant Archivistfor Management and Administration, the Assistant Archivist for the NationalArchives, the directors of the Presidential Libraries, the director ofthe Washington National Records Center, the directors of the Federal RecordCenters, or the directors of the Regional Archives, depending on wherethe individual requested the mandatory review or requested records underthe Freedom of Information Act. In-person requests may be made during normalbusiness hours listed for each location in the appendix following NARANotices. For written requests, provide some acceptable identification.Only general inquiries may be made by telephone. Contesting record procedures: NARA rules for contesting the contents and appealing initial determinationsare found in 36 CFR Part 1202. Record source categories: Researchers who have requested mandatory review of records or who haverequested records under the Freedom of Information Act. <ITAG tagnum="66">NARA 8</ITAG>System name: Restricted and Classified Records Access Authorization Files. System location: This system of records is located in the National Archives Building, PresidentialLibraries, Washington National Records Center, National Personnel RecordsCenter, Federal Records Centers, and the Regional Archives. The addressesare listed in the appendix following the NARA Notices. Categories of individuals covered by the system: Researchers who apply to use agency-restricted, donor/restricted, or classifiedrecords in the locations listed above.categories of records in the system:Applications and letters of authorization to use restricted and/or classifiedrecords, including name, address, telephone number, occupation, employer,security clearance, social security number, date and place of birth, purpose,field of interest, citizenship, intention to publish, and type of publication.authority for maintenance of the system:44 U.S.C. 2108 and 2204.routine uses of records maintained in the system, including categoriesof users and the purposes of such uses:The records are used by employees of NARA who have a need for the recordsin the performance of their duties to control access to restricted materials;to maintain a record of requests for access; and to authorize access torestricted/classified materials. Records in this system may be made availablefor access review to agencies whose restricted records are the subjectof an accesss request. The routine use statements A, F, and G, describedin the appendix following the NARA Notices, also apply to this system ofrecords.policies and practices for storing, retrieving, accessing, retaining, anddisposing of records in the system:storage:Paper records in card files and file folders.retrievability:Filed alphabetically at each location by name of individual.safeguards:During normal hours of operation, these records are maintained in areasaccessible only to authorized personnel of NARA. After hours, buildingshave security guards and/or doors are secured and all entrances are monitoredby electronic surveillance equipment.retention and disposal:These records relating to private individuals requesting access are cutoff annually, held one year, and retired. After 14 additional years theyare destroyed. Records relating to agency officials requesting access aredestroyed on supersession or obsolescence of the authorization document,or on transfer or sparation of the individual concerned. These proceduresare in accordance with the NARA Records Maintenance and Disposition Manual.system manager(s) and address:NARA officials with responsibility for this system of records are the AssistantArchivist for the National Archives at the National Archives Building,the directors of Presidential Libraries, the director of the WashingtonNational Records Center, the director of the National Personnel RecordsCenter, the directors of the Federal Record Centers and the directors ofthe Regional Archives, at the addresses listed for these locations in theappendix following the NARA Notices.notification procedures:Information may be obtained from the officials listed above at the appropriaterepository where individuals have applied for access to records. The addressesare listed in the appendix following the NARA Notices.record access procedure:Requests for these records should be addressed to the Assistant Archivistfor the National Archives, the directors of the Presidential Libraries,the directors of the Washington National Records Center, the director ofthe National Personnel Records Center, the directors of the Federal RecordsCenters or directors of the Regional Archives, depending on where the individualsubmitted his or her application for access to the records. In-person requestsmay be made during normal business hours listed for each location in theappendix following the NARA Notices. For written requests, provide fullname, address, telephone number, and the approximate dates the applicationwas made. For personal visits, individuals should be able to provide someacceptable identification, such as a driver's license or employee identificationcard. Only general inquiries may be made by telephone.contesting record procedures:NARA rules for contesting the contents and appealing initial determinationsare found in 36 CFR Part 1202.record source categories:Researchers and agency officials.<ITAG tagnum="66">NARA 9</ITAG>System name:Authors Files.system location:This system of records is located in the National Archives Building, PresidentialLibraries, and the Regional Archives. The addresses are listed in the appendixfollowing the NARA Notices.categories of individuals covered by the system:Authors whose publications are based on National Archives holdings andauthors who have submitted manuscripts which have been published or consideredfor publication in <T3>Prologue: The Journal of the National Archives.</T3>categories of records in the system:Biographical information about the authors including name, address, telephonenumber, occupation, education, and research interests, and manuscript copiesof writings.authority for maintenance of the system:44 U.S.C. 2307.routine uses of records maintained in the system, including categoriesof users and the purposes of such uses:The records are used by employees of NARA who have a need for the recordsin the performance of their duties to provide an indication of areas ofinterest in archival holdings and the extent to which the scholarly communityrelies on National Archives holdings as primary source material; and tomaintain a record of manuscripts which <T3>Prologue</T3> has rejected or accepted and published. The routine usestatement F, described in the appendix following the NARA Notices, alsoapplies to this system of records.policies and practices for storing, retrieving, accessing, retaining, anddisposing of records in the system:retrievability:Filed alphabetically at each location by name of individual.safeguards:During normal hours of operation, these records are maintained in areasaccessible only to authorized personnel of NARA. After hours, buildingshave security guards and/or doors are secured, and all entrances are monitoredby electronic surveillance equipment.retention and disposal:Disposition of these records shall be in accordance with the NARA RecordsMaintenance and Disposition Manual. system manager(s) and address:NARA officials responsible for this geographically dispersed system ofrecords are the Assistant Archivist for the National Archives and the AssistantArchivist for Public Programs at the National Archives Building, the directorsof the Presidential Libraries, and the directors of the Regional Archives.The addresses are listed in the appendix following the NARA Notices. notification procedure:Information may be obtained from the official listed above at the appropriaterepository where individuals have used records or submitted manuscriptsfor publication. The addresses are listed in the appendix following theNARA Notices. record access procedure:Requests for these records should be addressed to the Assistant Archivistfor the National Archives, the Assistant Archivist for Public Programs,the directors of the Presidential Libraries, or the directors of the RegionalArchives. In-person requests may be made during normal business hours listedfor each location in the appendix following NARA notices. For written requests,provide full name, address, telephone number, and the title of publication.For personal visits, individuals should be able to provide some acceptableidentification such as a driver's license or an employee identificationcard. Only general inquiries may be made by telephone. contesting record procedures:NARA rules for contesting the contents and appealing initial determinationsare found in 36 CFR Part 1202. record source categories:Authors and NARA employees. <ITAG tagnum="66">NARA 10 </ITAG>System name:Employee Drug Abuse/Alcoholism Files. system location:This system of records in located in the personnel offices of NARA at theaddresses listed in the appendix following the NARA Notices; in the officesof designated counselors; and in the offices of supervisors who superviseemployees suspected or known to have drug abuse problems (including alcoholism).categories of individuals covered by the system:NARA employees who have been suspected or known to have an alcohol or drugabuse problem. categories of records in the system:This system of records includes referrals for counseling, counseling files,and referrals for rehabilitative assistance. authority for maintenance of the system:21 U.S.C. 1101 et seq. and 5 U.S.C. 7901. routine uses of records maintained in the system, including categoriesof users and the purposes of such uses:The records in this system of records are used to document that supervisorshave properly dealt with employees whose work is affected by alcohol orother drug abuse; to communicate information to personnel having a needfor the information in connection with their duties, such as medical orhealth personnel, alcohol or other drug abuse counselors and program administrators,and qualified service organizations; to provide a basis for meeting reportingrequirements to the Office of Personnel Management; and to disclose informationto the Department of Justice or other appropriate Federal agencies in defendingclaims against the United States, when the claim is based upon an employee'smental or physical condition and is alleged to have arisen because of theactivities of NARA in connection with such individual. Such disclosurewill be restrictively made; in particular, disclosures of information pertainingto an individual with a history of alcohol or other drug abuse will belimited in compliance with the restrictions of the confidentiality of Alcoholand Drug Abuse Patient Records regulation, 42 CFR Part 2. policies and practices for storing, retrieving, accessing, retaining, anddisposing of records in the system:storage:Paper records in file drawers or cabinets. retrievability:Filed alphabetically at each location by name of individual. safeguards:When not in normal use by an authorized person, these records are storedin lockable metal file cabinets or in secured rooms. retention and disposal:These records are maintained for 1 year after the employee's last contactwith the counselor, or until the employee's separation or transfer, whichevercomes first. These records are destroyed by shredding or burning. system manager(s) and address:The Director of Personnel at 601 D Streets NW., Washington, DC. Mailingaddress: National Archives and Records Administration (NAP), Washington,DC 20408. notification procedure:Current NARA employees may obtain information about whether they are partof this system of records from their supervisor or from their personnelofficer at the appropriate address listed in the appendix following theNARA Notices, or from the NARA Director of Personnel at the address notedabove, whichever is applicable. Former NARA employees should direct requeststo gain access to information pertaining to them to the appropriate NARApersonnel officer at the address listed in the appendix. For identificationrequirements refer to the NARA regulations outlined in 36 CFR Part 1202.contesting record procedures:NARA rules for contesting the contents and appealing initial determinationsare found in 36 CFR Part 1202. record source categories:Supervisors, counselors, personnel specialists, and the employees themselves.<ITAG tagnum="66">NARA 11</ITAG>system name: Credentials, Passes, and Licenses. system location: This system of records is maintained by the Administrative Services Division,National Archives Building, 7th and Pennsylvania Avenue NW., Washington,DC; the Director of the Washington National Records Center, 4205 SuitlandRoad, Suitland, Maryland; and by the Administrative Officers at other NARAfacilities listed in the appendix following the NARA Notices.  <ITAG tagnum="66"/>categories of individuals covered by the system:All NARA employees, contractors and volunteers whose assigned responsibilitiesrequire the issuance of credentials for identification and security purposes,or a license to operate a motor vehicle.categories of records in the system:1. Standard Form 47, Physical Fitness Inquiry for Motor Vehicle Operators(Name, date of birth, title of position, home address, agency medical inquiry,applicant's signature and date, signature of designated official, and date).2. NA Form 6006, Request for and Record of Credential or Pass (Name, descriptionof individual, SSN, and place of employment).3. NA Form 6000, National Archives Identification Card (Photo, signatureof employee, name of employee, signature of issuing official, date issued,identification serial number, height, weight, color eyes, color hair, anddate of birth).4. NA Form 7001, Application for Motor Vehicle Operator's identificationCard (SF 46) (Name, organization, type of vehicle, personal data and drivingrecord, applicant's signature and date, physical fitness certificationby signature of certifying official, and certification of eligibility bysignature of certifying official).5. Of 7, Property Pass (Name, building, description of property, agency,and effective date).6. . NA Form 6009, Parking Control Record (Name, address, agency, correspondencesymbol, office telephone number, and length of service).authority for maintenance of the system:44 U.S.C. 2104.routine uses of records maintained in the system, including categoriesof users and the purposes of such uses:The records in this system are used primarily to facilitate the issuanceand control of cards, parking permits, building passes, drivers licenses,and similar credentials. The routine use statements A, B, and F, describedin the appendix following the NARA Notices, also apply to this system ofrecords.policies and practices for storing, retrieving, accessing, retaining, anddisposing of records in the system:storage:Paper forms.retrievability:By name.safeguards:When not in use by an authorized person, these records will be stored inlockable metal file cabinets or in secured areas.retention and disposal:Credential and pass records are destroyed 3 months after expiration, revocationor return to issuing office. Motor vehicle records are destroyed 3 yearsafter employee separation or rescission of certificate, and parking controlrecords when 3 years old. These procedures are in accordance with the NARARecords Maintenance and Disposition Manual.system manager(s) and address:The official NARA responsible for this system of records is the Directorof Administrative Services, 7th and Pennsylvania Avenue NW., Washington,DC. Since this is a geographically dispersed system, individuals may alsogain access to it by contacting the Administrative Officers at locationslisted in the appendix following the NARA Notices or the Director, WashingtonNational Records Center (NCW), Washington, DC 20409.notification procedure:The addresses of the NARA offices to which inquiries should be addressedand addresses at which an individual may request whether a system containsrecords pertaining to himself or herself are shown in the appendix followingthe NARA notices. Individuals should provide name, social security number,period of employment, and position held to assist the office in locatingthe record.record access procedure:Individuals can obtain information on the procedures for gaining accessto or contesting records from the Director of Administrative Services,the Director of the Washington National Records Center, or the AdministrativeOfficers at NARA facilities, as shown in the appendix following the NARANotices.contesting record procedures:NARA rules for contesting the contents and appealing initial determinationsare found in 36 CFR Part 1202.record source categories:Information is provided by the employee, contractor or volunteer beingissued the credential and by the issuing official.<ITAG tagnum="66">NARA 12</ITAG>System name:Emergency Notification Rosters and Files.system location:This system of records is maintained in the Administrative Services Division,7th and Pennsylvania Avenue NW., Washington, DC and in all NARA facilitiesoutside the Washington, DC metropolitan area listed in the appendix followingthe NARA Notices.categories of individuals covered by the system:NARA officials at division director level and above, and NARA employeeswith emergency assignments.categories of records in the system:Records consist of roster of NARA officials; NARA employee emergency assignments;and essential employees's residence telephone numbers. Information includesname, office and home telephone numbers, home address, title and emergencyassignment.authority for maintenance of the system:44 U.S.C. 2104.routine uses of records maintained in the system, including categoriesof users and the purposes of such uses:The records in this system are used primarily to maintain current directoryinformation on key NARA officials or for use by the Central Office contactpoint during weekends, holidays, and emergencies; to provide essentialtelephone service to key employees during emergencies; and to notify officialsand employees of emergency conditions.policies and practices for storing, retrieving, accessing, retaining, anddisposing of records in the system:storage:Paper.Retrievability:  Indexed by name.  Safeguards:  When not in use by an authorized person, these records will be stored inlockable metal file cabinets or in secured areas.  Retention and disposal:  Disposition of records shall be in accordance with the NARA Records Maintenanceand Disposition Manual.  System manager(s) and address:  The NARA official with overall responsibility for the system of recordsis the Director of Administrative Services, 7th and Pennsylvania AvenueNW., Washington, DC. Since this is a geographically dispersed system ofrecords, individuals may gain access to it by contacting the officialsat locations listed in the appendix following the NARA Notices.  Notification procedure:  NARA employees may obtain information as to whether they are part of thissystem of records from the Director of Administrative Services or the appropriatedirector of a Presidential Library, Federal Records Center, Regional Archives,the Washington National Records Center or National Personnel Records Centerlisted in the appendix following the NARA Notices.  Record access procedures:  An individual can obtain information on the procedures for gaining accessto records from the Director of Administrative Services or the appropriatedirector of a Presidential Library, Federal Records Center, Regional Archives,the Washington National Records Center, or National Personnel Records Centerlisted in the appendix following the NARA Notices.  Contesting record procedures:  NARA rules for contesting the contents and appealing initial determinationsare found in 36 CFR Part 1202.  Record source categories:  Information is provided by subject individuals and their supervisors. <ITAG tagnum="66">NARA 13  </ITAG>System name:  Defunct Agency Records.  System location:  This system of records is located in the Federal records centers at thelocations listed in the appendix following the NARA Notices.  Categories of individuals covered by the system:  Employees of defunct agencies and individuals who may have had dealingswith the defunct agencies.  Categories of records in the system:  Records other than those covered by Governmentwide systems which are arrangedor can be retrieved alphabetically by name or other personal identifiers. Authority for maintenance of the system:  44 U.S.C. 2108.  Routine use of records maintained in the system:  The routine use of statements A, B, C, F, and G, described in the appendixfollowing the NARA notices, apply to this system of records. The records,if unscheduled for disposition, are routinely used during the appraisalprocess.  Policies and practices for storing, retrieving, accessing, retaining, anddisposing of records in the system:  Storage:  Paper records in file folders and card files, microfilm records in reels,and computer records on tapes. All records stored in record center containers. Retrievability:  Records are retrieved generally by name or social security number.  Safeguards:  When not in use by an authorized person, the records are stored in recordcenter containers located in Federal records center storage areas.  Retention and disposal:  Records appraised as permanent will be transferred to the custody of theOffice of the National Archives. Records appraised as temporary will bedestroyed immediately or after a fixed period of time, whichever is approvedby the Archivist of the United States.  System manager(s) and address:  The system manager is the Deputy Archivist of the United States, 7th andPennsylvania Avenue NW., Washington, DC. Mailing address: National Archivesand Records Administration (ND), Washington, DC 20408.  Notification procedure:  Requests for assistance should be made to the Deputy Archivist of the UnitedStates, National Archives and Records Administration (ND), Washington,DC 20408.  Record access procedures:  NARA procedures for record access are contained in 36 CFR Part 1202.  Contesting record procedures:  NARA rules for contesting the contents and appealing initial determinationsare found in 36 CFR Part 1202.  Record source categories:  Upon termination of an agency, the agency transfers its records to thecustody of NARA.  <ITAG tagnum="66">NARA 14  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="66"/>System name:Payroll and Time and Attendance Reporting System. system location:This system of records is located in the NARA offices wherever there aretimekeepers and at the addresses listed in the appendix following the NARANotices. An automated series of records in this system, the Payroll InformationProcessing System (PIPS), is maintained for NARA by the General ServicesAdministration under a reimbursable agreement. categories of individuals covered by the system:Current and former NARA employees. categories of records in the system:The system provides for reporting each employee's pay status as eitheron the job time or as paid or unpaid time, including absences without authorizedleave. Accordingly, records include but are not limited to name, home address,telephone number, work location, social security number, hours of duty,and payroll and attendance information. authority for maintenance of the system:5 U.S.C., Part III (sec 2101-8901), is the authority for the overall system.Specific authority for use of social security numbers is contained ExecutiveOrder 9397, 26 CFR 31.6011(b)2, and 26 CFR 31.6109-1. routine uses of records maintained in the system, including categoriesof users and the purposes of such uses:To the extent necessary, the records are available outside NARA to monitorand document grievance proceedings, EEO complaints, and adverse actions;and to conduct counseling sessions. The information contained in this systemof records may be disclosed to the Office of Management and Budget in connectionwith the review of private relief legislation at any stage of the legislativecoordination and clearance process. A record from this system of recordsmay be provided to the Office of Personnel Management in its productionof summary descriptive statistics for which these records are collectedand maintained, or for related work studies. While published statisticsand studies do not contain individual identifiers, in some instances theselection of elements of data included in the study may be structured ina way to make individuals identifiable by inference. The routine use statementsA, B, C, D, E, F, G, and H, described in the appendix following the NARANotices, also apply to this system of records. policies and practices for storing, retrieving, accessing, retaining, anddisposing of records in the system:storage:Paper records in file folders, card files, and cabinets; microfilm recordsin reels and cabinets; microfiche in cabinets; magnetic tapes and cardsin cabinets and storage libraries; and computer records within a computerand attached equipment. retrievability:Filed alphabetically by name. safeguards:Stored in guarded buildings and/or in controlled areas. retention and disposal:Disposition of these records will be in accordance with the NARA RecordsMaintenance and Disposition Manual. system manager(s) and address:Chief, National Payroll Center, General Services Administration, 1500 E.Bannister, Kansas City, MO 64131. Mailing Address: Chief, National PayrollCenter (6BCY-N), P.O. Box 419277, Kansas City, MO 64414.notification procedure:Current NARA employees may obtain information about this system of recordsfrom their supervisor or from the address listed above. Former NARA employeesmay obtain information at the address listed above. record access procedures:Requests from current or former NARA employees to access records shouldbe directed to the employe's superior or to the Chief, National PayrollCenter at the address noted above, whichever is applicable. For writtenrequests, former NARA employees should provide full name, social securitynumber, address, telephone number, and approximate dates and places ofemployment. For identification requirements, refer to the agency regulationsas outlined in 36 CFR Part 1202.contesting record procedures:NARA rules for contesting the contents and appealing initial determinationsare found in 36 CFR Part 1202.record source categories:The individuals themselves, other NARA employees, supervisors, other Federalagencies, and management officials. <ITAG tagnum="66">NARA 15</ITAG>System name:Editorial Freelance Vendor File. System location: The system is located in the National Archives Building. Categories of individuals covered by the system:Former and current freelance vendors qualified to perform editorial services.Categories of records in the system:Correspondence with the biographical information about former and currenteditorial freelance vendors, including all or parts of the following: name,address, telephone number, education, professional vita, samples of work,assignments and evaluations of work done for NARA, and purchase order documents.Authority for maintenance of the system:44 U.S.C. 2104.Routine uses of records maintained in the system, including categoriesof users and the purposes of such uses:The records are used by the employees of NARA who have a need for the recordsin the performance of their duties to review professional qualificationsof freelance contract editors; to make editorial assignments to freelancecontract editors; to review progress being made on an assignment; to evaluatethe quality of work performed during an assignment; and to account formoney spent on contract editorial work.Policies and practices for storing, retrieving, accessing, retaining, anddisposing of records in the system:Storage:Paper records in file folders.Retrievability:Filed alphabetically by name of individual.Safeguards:System is in a locked file cabinet.Retention and disposal:Disposition of these records will be in accordance with the NARA RecordsMaintenance and Disposition Manual.System manager(s) and address:The officials responsible for this system are the Director, PublicationsDivision (NEP) and the Chief, Archival Publications Staff (NN-E) in theNational Archives Building. The address for this location is listed inthe appendix following the NARA notices.Notification procedures:Information may be obtained from the applicable system manager.Record access procedures:Requests for these records should be addressed to the Director, PublicationsDivision, Office of Public Programs or the Chief, Archival PublicationsStaff, Office of the National Archives, as appropriate. In-person requestsmay be made during normal business hours. For written requests, providefull name, address, telephone number, and data span. For personal visits,individuals should provide some acceptable identification, such as a driver'slicense or employee identification card. Only general inquiries may bemade by telephone.Contesting record procedures:NARA rules for contesting the contents and appealing initial determinationsare found in 36 CFR Part 1202.Record source categories:Former and current freelance vendors qualified to perform editorial servicesand NARA employees.<ITAG tagnum="66">NARA 16</ITAG>System name:Library Circulation Files.System location:This system of records is located in the Reference Services Branch in theNational Archives Building and the Washington National Records Center.The addresses are listed in the appendix following the NARA notices.Categories of individuals covered by the system:All NARA employees who have borrowed books and other materials from theLibrary.Categories of records in the system:Specialized forms giving the names of individuals, materials borrowed,and dates of loan.Authority for maintenance of the system:44 U.S.C. 2104.Routine uses of records maintained in the system, including categoriesof users and the purposes of such uses:The records are primarily used by the Reference Services Branch staff forcontrolling the circulation of library monogrphs and serials. The routineuse statements A and F, described in the appendix following the NARA Notices,apply to this system of records.Policies and practices for storing, retrieving, accessing, retaining, anddisposing of records in the system:Storage:Paper records in file trays.Retrievability:Filed alphabetically by name.Safeguards:Records are stored in an area available to authorized Reference ServicesBranch personnel only.Retention and disposal:Disposition of records is in accordance with the NARA Records Maintenanceand Disposition Manual.System manager(s) and address:The Chief, Reference Services Branch (NNRS), 7th and Pennsylvania Avenue,NW, Washington, DC. Mailing address: National Archives and Records Administration(NNRS), Washington, DC 20408.Notification procedure:NARA employees may obtain information about whether they are part of thissystem of records from the Library staff at the address listed above.Record access procedures:Requests from NARA employees to gain access to information pertaining tothem should be directed to the Chief, Reference Services Branch (NNRS),7th and Pennsylvania Avenue NW., Washington, DC. For identification requirementsrefer to the agency regulations as outlined in 36 CFR Part 1202.Contesting record procedures:NARA rules for contesting the contents and appealing initial determinationsare found in 36 CFR Part 1202.Record source categories:NARA employees borrowing books and other materials from the National ArchivesLibrary.<ITAG tagnum="66">NARA 17</ITAG>System name:Grievance Records.System location:These records are located in the personnel offices of NARA at the locationlisted in the appendix following the NARA Notices or designated officesin NARA where the grievances were filed.Categories of individuals covered by the system: Current or former NARA employees who have submitted grievances with NARAin accordance with the Office of Personnel Management (OPM) Regulations(5 CFR Part 771) or a negotiated procedure.Categories of records in the system: This system of records contains records relating to grievances filed byNARA employees under the OPM regulations. These case files contain alldocuments related to grievances including statements of witnesses, reportsof interviews and hearings, examiner's findings and recommendations, acopy of the original and final decision, and related correspondence andexhibits. This system also includes files and records of internal grievancesfiled under negotiated grievance procedures.Authority for maintenance of the system: 5 U.S.C. 1302, 3301, and 3302; E.O. 10577 (3 CFR 1954-1958 Comp., p. 218);E.O. 10987 (3 CFR 1959-1963 Comp., p. 519).Routine uses of records maintained in the system, including categoriesof users and the purposes of such uses:The records in this system of records are used to disclose informationto any source from which additional information is requested in the courseof processing a grievance, to the extent necessary to identify an individual,inform the source of the purpose(s) of the request and identify the typeof information requested. They are also used to provide information toofficials of labor organizations recognized under the Civil Service ReformAct when relevant and necessary to their duties of exclusive presentationconcerning personnel policies, practices, and matters affecting work conditions.The routine use statements D, F, G, and H, described in the appendix followingthe NARA Notices, also apply to this system of records.Policies and practices for storing, retrieving, accessing, retaining, anddisposing of records in the system: Storage: These records are maintained in file folders.Retrievability:These records are retrieved by the names of the individuals on whom theyare maintained.Safeguards:These records are maintained in lockable metal filing cabinets to whichonly authorized personnel have access.Retention and disposal:These records are disposed of 3 years after closing of the case. Disposalis by shredding or burning.System manager(s) and address:The Director, Personnel Service Division, 601 D Street NW., Washington,DC. Mailing address: National Archives and Records Administration (NAP),Washington, DC 20408.Notification procedure:It is required that individuals submitting grievances be provided a copyof the record under the grievance process. They may, however, contact theNARA personnel, or other designated office, where the action was processedregarding the existence of such records on them. They must furnish thefollowing information for their records to be located and identified: Name,date of birth, approximate date of closing of the case and kind of actiontaken, and the organization component involved.Record access procedures:It is required that individuals submitting grievances be provided a copyof the record under the grievance process. However, after the action hasbeen closed, an individual may request access to the official copy of thegrievance file by contacting the NARA personnel or other designated officewhere the action was processed. Individuals must provide the followinginformation for their records to be located and identified: Name, dateof birth, approximate date of closing of the case, kind of action taken,and organizational component involved. Individuals requesting access mustalso follow the NARA regulations as outlined in 36 CFR Part 1202 regardingaccess to records.Contesting record procedures:Review of requests from individuals seeking amendment of their recordswhich have been the subject of a judicial or quasi-judicial action willbe limited in scope. Review of amendment requests of these records willbe restricted to determine if the record accurately documents the actionof NARA's ruling on the case and will not include a review of the meritsof the action, determination, or finding. Individuals wishing to requestamendment of their records to correct factual errors should contact theNARA personnel or designated office where the grievance was processed.Individuals must furnish the following information for their records tobe located and identified: Name, date of birth, approximate date of closingof the case, kind of action taken, and organizational component involved.Individuals must also follow the NARA Privacy Act regulations outlinedin 36 CFR Part 1202 regarding amendment to records.Record source categories:Information in this system of records is provided by the individual onwhom the record is maintained, by testimony of witnesses, by agency officials,and from related correspondence from organizations or persons.<ITAG tagnum="66">NARA 18</ITAG>System name:General Law Files. System location:This system of records is maintained by the Legal Service Staff, NationalArchives Building, 7th and Pennsylvania Avenue NW., Washington, DC. Mailingaddress: National Archives and Records Administration (NSL), Washington,DC 20408.Categories of individuals covered by the system: The system covers one or more of the following categories of individuals:NARA employees, past and present; other Federal agency employees; membersof the public (including individuals, corporations, and firms); witnessesin litigation; persons who have Freedom of Information and Privacy Actrequests and persons about whom such requests have been made; persons pursuingtort claims against the Government or who are involved in litigation withNARA and/or have filed grievances.Categories of records in the system: The system covers one or more of the following categories of records: Nameof individual; position description, grade, salary; SSN; work history;complaint; history of the case; applicable law; working papers of attorneys;testimony of witnesses; background investigation materials, records subjectto complaint, request, or litigation; correspondence; damage reports; contracts,accident reports, pleadings; affidavits; credit ratings; medical diagnosesand prognoses; doctor's bills; estimates of repair costs; invoices; litigationreports; financial data; and other data.Authority for maintenance of the system:5 U.S.C. 552 as amended; 5 U.S.C. 552a; 5 U.S.C., Part II; 5 U.S.C., Chapter33; 5 U.S.C. 5108, 5314-5316 and 42 U.S.C. 20003, et seq.; 5 U.S.C. 7151-7154;5 U.S.C. 7301; 5 U.S.C. 7501, note (adverse actions); 5 U.S.C., Chapter77; 11 U.S.C.; 28 U.S.C. 1291, 1346(b)(c), 1402(b), 1504, 2110, 2401(b),2402, 2411(b), 2412(c), 2671-2680; 31 U.S.C. 191; 31 U.S.C. 951-953, 341U.S.C. 240-243; E.O. 6166; E.O. 10577; E.O. 11491; E.O. 11787.Routine uses of records maintained in the system, including categoriesof users and the purposes of such uses:Records are used to give general legal advice, as requested, throughoutNARA and to prepare attorneys for hearings and trials, to reference pastactions, and to maintain internal statistics. Information may be releasedto the Department of Justice in review, settlement, defense, and prosecutionof claims, complaints, and law suits involving contracts, torts, debts,bankruptcy, personnel adverse action, EEO, unit determination, unfair laborpractices, and Freedom of Information and Privacy Act requests. The routineuse statements A, B, C, E, F, and G, described in the appendix followingthe NARA notices, also supply to this system of records.Policies and practices for storing, retrieving, accessing, retaining, anddisposing of records in the system: Storage: Paper.Retrievability: Manual, by name.Safeguards:Records are stored in secured buildings; available to authorized personsonly.Retention and disposal:Disposition of records shall be in accordance with the NARA Records Maintenanceand Disposition Manual.System manager(s) and address:The system manager for the system is: Director, Legal Services Staff (NSL).Notification procedure:NARA notification procedures are contained in 36 CFR Part 1202.Record access procedures:NARA procedures for record access are contained in 36 CFR Part 1202.Contesting record procedures:NARA rules for contesting the contents and appealing initial determinationsare found in 36 CFR Part 1202.Record source categories:Information in this system of records comes from one or more of the followingsources: Federal employees and private parties involved in torts, contracts,personnel actions, unfair labor practices, and debts concerning the FederalGovernment; general law texts and sources; Dun and Bradstreet and othersources of financial information; law enforcement officers; and witnesses.<ITAG tagnum="66">NARA 19</ITAG>System name:Workers Compensation Case Files.System location:This system of records is located in the Employee and Labor Relations Branch,601 D Street, NW., Washington, DC; in administrative offices of field units;and in the offices of all supervisors who have had employees injured onthe job or employees with other occupational health problems. The addressesfor these locations are listed in the appendix following the NARA Notices.Categories of individuals covered by the system:NARA employees who have sustained injuries or other occupational healthproblems.Categories of records in the system:This system contains accident reports (including CA-1 andamp; 2: FederalEmployees Notice of Injury or Occupational Disease); claims for compensationfor injury or occupation disease (CA-4); and claims for continuance ofcompensation on account of disability (CA-8).Authority for maintenance of the system:5 U.S.C. Chap. 81 (Compensation for Work Injuries) and 5 U.S.C. 7203 and7901.Routine uses of records maintained in the system, including categoriesof users and the purposes of such uses:The records in this system of records are used to identify and record thoseemployees who have sustained injuries or other occupational health problemsand provide information required by applicable law to be disclosed to aFederal, State, or local public health service agency concerning individualswho have contracted certain communicable diseases or conditions. Such informationis used to prevent further outbreak of the disease or condition and isused in connection with a claim for benefits filed by an employee. Theroutine use statements A, B, C, F, and G, described in the appendix followingthe NARA Notices, also apply to this system of records.Policies and practices for storing, retrieving, accessing, retaining, anddisposing of records in the system:Storage:Paper records in file cabinets.Retrievability:Filed alphabetically at each location by name.Safeguards:When not in use by an authorized person, these records are stored in lockablemetal file cabinets or in secured rooms.Retention and disposal:Disposition of records shall be in accordance with the NARA Records Maintenanceand Disposition Manual.System manager(s) and address:Chief, Employee and Labor Relations Branch, 601 D Street NW., Washington,DC. Mailing address: National Archives and Records Administration (NAPL),Washington, DC 20408.Notification procedure:Current NARA employees may obtain information about whether they are apart of this system of records from their supervisor or from their administrativeofficer at the appropriate address listed in the appendix following theNARA Notices, or from the Chief, Labor and Employee Relations Branch atthe address noted above, whichever is applicable. Former NARA employeesmay obtain information from the appropriate administrative officer at theaddresses listed in the appendix.Record access procedures:Requests from current NARA employees to gain access to information pertainingto them should be directed to their supervisor or to their administrativeofficer at the appropriate address listed in the appendix following theNARA Notices, or to the Chief, Labor and Employee Relations Branch at theaddress noted above, whichever is applicable. Former NARA employees shoulddirect requests to gain access to information pertaining to them to theappropriate administrative officer at the address listed in the appendix.For identification requirements, refer to the agency regulations as outlinedin 36 CFR Part 1201.Contesting record procedures:NARA rules for contesting the contents and appealing initial determinationsare found in 36 CFR Part 1202.Record source categories:Information in this system of records is provided by the individuals towhom the records pertain, by supervisors required to complete various forms,or by the personnel specialists who prepare various records or claims.<ITAG tagnum="66">NARA 20</ITAG>System name:Reviewer/Consultant File.System location:This system of records is located at the National Historical Publicationsand Records Commission, 7th and Pennsylvania Avenue NW., Washington, DC.Categories of individuals covered by the system:Archival reviewers and consultants who apply to serve as consultants orreviewers for the National Historical Publications and Records Commission's(NHPRC) records grant program.Categories of records in the system:Biographical information about the reviewers and consultants includingname, address, telephone number, education, professional vita, publications,archival skills, archival and historical records experience, and programevaluation experience.Authority for maintenance of the system:44 U.S.C. 2501-2506.Routine uses of records maintained in the system, including categoriesof users and the purposes of such uses:The biographical material is used by NHPRC staff principally in the recordsgrant program for selecting reviewers to evaluate proposals received byNHPRC and for proposing possible archival consultants for those individualswho have received grants. The routine use statement F, described in theappendix following the NARA Notices, also applies to this system of records.Policies and practices for storing, retrieving, accessing, retaining, anddisposing of records in the system:Storage:Paper records in file folders.Retrievability:Filed alphabetically by name of individual.Safeguards:During normal hours of operation, records are maintained in areas accessibleonly to authorized personnel of NARA. After hours, the building has securityguards and/or doors are secured and all entrances are monitored by electronicsurveillance equipment.Retention and disposal:Records are destroyed when no longer needed for administrative purposes.System manager(s) and address:The official responsible for the system is the Executive Director, NationalHistorical Publications and Records Commission, 7th and Pennsylvania Avenue,NW., Washington, DC. Mailing address: National Historical Publicationsand Records Commission (NP), Washington, DC 20408.Notification procedure: Inquiries by individuals as to whether the system contains a record pertainingto themselves should be addressed to the system manager. Record access procedures: Requests from individuals for access to records should be addressed tothe system manager. In-person requests may be made during normal businesshours. For written requests individuals should provide full name, address,telephone number, and approximate date of communication with the Commission.For personal visits, individuals should be able to provide some acceptableidentification such as a driver's license or employee identification card.Only general inquiries may be made by telephone. Contesting record procedures: NARA rules for contesting the contents and appealing initial determinationsare found in 36 CFR Part 1202. Record source categories: Archival experts who have volunteered to serve as reviewers or consultants.<ITAG tagnum="66">NARA 22 </ITAG>System name: Employee Related Files. System location: This system of records may be maintained at the supervisory or administrativeoffices at all NARA facilities. Categories of individuals covered by the system: Former and current NARA employees, applicants for employment, volunteerworkers, and relatives of employees of the National Personnel Records Center.Categories of records in the system: This system consists of a variety of employee related records maintainedby operating officials for the purpose of administering personnel mattersaffecting their employees and uncompensated workers. The documents include,but are not limited to, information on the individuals relating to name,social security number, birth date, home and emergency addresses and telephonenumbers, personnel actions, professional registration, qualifications,training, congressional employee relief bills, injuries, employment history,awards and other recognition, counseling, warnings, reprimands, grievances,appeals, conduct, leave, pay, attendance, work assignments, performance,assessments, applications for permits and passes, indebtedness complaints,travel, and outside employment. The documents include military servicedata on employees of the National Personnel Records Center and their relativesaccumulated by operating officials in administering the records securityprogram at the Center. This system does not include official personnelfiles which are covered by the Office of Personnel Management's systemsof records OPM/GOVT-1 through 10. Authority for maintenance of the system: Titles 5 and 31 U.S.C. generally. Routine uses of records maintained in the system, including categoriesof users and the purposes of such uses: The records in this system of records are used to initiate requests forpersonnel actions, to plan and schedule training, to counsel employeeson their performance, to establish a basis for proposing recommendationsfor disciplinary actions, and to carry out personnel management responsibilitiesin general. The routine use statements A, B, C, D, F, and G, describedin the appendix following the NARA Notices, also apply to this system ofrecords. Policies and practices for storing, retrieving, accessing, retaining, anddisposing of records in the system: Storage: Paper records in file folders and card files, magnetic tape and disks,and computer printout. Retrievability: The records within this system are primarily retrieved by name. Safeguards: When not in use by an authorized person, these records are stored in lockablefile cabinets, lockable desk drawers, and/or in secured rooms. Retention and disposal: Records are reviewed annually, documents are updated, and irrelevant documentsdestroyed. No copies of records are retained in this system after the originalor copies of the same records have been purged from the Official PersonnelFolders. When an employee leaves the agency through transfer or other separation,the records in this system are immediately forwarded to the office maintainingthe Official Personnel Folder. There the records are screened to ensurethat there are no records that should be permanently filed in the OfficialPersonnel Folder. The records in this system are then destroyed. System manager(s) and address: Administrative officers in NARA field facilities and all NARA supervisorsmaintaining employee related files. The addresses of Administrative officersand NARA supervisors are listed in the appendix following the NARA Notices.Notification procedure: Information about whether an individual is a part of this system of recordsmay be obtained from the supervisors at the appropriate repository wherethe individuals have records. If not known, general inquiries should bemade to the appropriate Head of the Offices or Staffs. Their addressesare listed in the appendix following the NARA Notices. Record access procedures: Requests from current NARA employees to gain access to information pertainingto them should be directed to their supervisor or to their personnel officerat the appropriate address listed in the appendix following the NARA Notices,or to the Director, Personnel Services Division at the address noted above,whichever is applicable. Former NARA employees should direct requests togain access to information pertaining to them to the appropriate administrativeofficer at the address listed in the appendix. For identification requirementsrefer to the agency regulations as outlined in 36 CFR Part 1202. Contesting record procedures: NARA rules for contesting the contents and appealing initial determinationsare found in 36 CFR Part 1202. Record source categories: The individuals themselves, other employees, supervisors, personnel records,and third parties submitting indebtedness complaints. <ITAG tagnum="66">NARA 23 </ITAG>System name:  Investigation Case Files. System classification:  Some of the material contained in the system has been classified in theinterests of the national security pursuant to Executive Order 12356. System location:  Investigative case files are maintained by the office conducting the investigation.There are three locations for this system: The Administrative ServicesDivision (NAS) and the Legal Services Staff (NSL) at the National ArchivesBuilding, and the Inspector General (NG) at 601 D Street, NW., Washington,DC. Mailing address: National Archives and Records Administration, Washington,DC, 20408. Categories of individuals in the system:  Individuals covered by the system are employees, applicants for employment,and former employees of NARA and advisory committee members. Also includedare researchers, employees of contractors performing custodial or guardservices in buildings under NARA jurisdiction, individuals who have beenthe source of a complaint or an allegation that a crime has taken place,witnesses having information or evidence concerning an investigation andsuspects in criminal, administrative, or civil actions. Categories of records in the system:  Investigative files contain information such as name, date and place ofbirth, experience, and investigatory material. Authority for maintenance of the system:  5 U.S.C. App. Section 2 et seq.; Executive Order 10450; Executive Order11478; Executive Order 11246; Executive Order 12356; and 40 U.S.C. 276athrough a-7, 276c, 318(a) through (d), and 327 through 331. Routine uses of records maintained in the system, including categoriesof users and the purposes of such uses:  The records are used to make determinations resulting from authorized investigationsand to document such investigations. The routine use statements A, B, C,and G, described in the appendix following the NARA Notices, apply to thissystem of records. Policies and practices for storing, retrieving, accessing, retaining, anddisposing of records in the system:  Storage:  Paper records in files and file folders. Retrievability:  Records are retrieved by name from files that are indexed alphabeticallyand filed numerically by case number or location and incident. Safeguards:  These records are maintained in lockable cabinets in rooms that are securedat the close of the business day, in guarded buildings, with access limitedto authorized personnel. System manager(s) and address:  The system managers are the Director of Administrative Services (NAS) andthe Director, Legal Services Staff (NSL) at the National Archives Building,and the Inspector General (NG) at 601 D Street, NW., Washington, DC. Mailingaddress: National Archives and Records Administration, (followed by theappropriate mail routing code in parentheses), Washington, DC 20408. Notification procedure:  Inquiries made by individuals as to whether the system contains a recordpertaining to themselves should be addressed to the appropriate systemmanager at the addresses and locations listed above. Record access procedures:  Requests from individuals for access to records should be addressed tothe Director of Administrative Services (NAS), the Director, Legal ServicesStaff (NSL) or the Inspector General, as appropriate. Requests should includefull name (maiden name where appropriate), address, and date and placeof birth. Only general inquiries may be made by phone. Contesting record procedures:  NARA rules for contesting the contents and appealing intitial determinationsare found in 36 CFR Part 1202. Record source categories:  Individuals, employees, informants, law enforcement agencies, other governmentagencies, intelligence sources, employers, references, co-workers, neighbors,and educational institutions. Systems exempted from certain provisions of the act:  In accordance with 5 U.S.C. 552a (k)(1), (k)(2), and (k)(5), this systemof records is exempt from subsections (c)(3); (d); (e)(1); (E)(4) (G),(H), and (I); and (f) of the Privacy Act of 1974. The system is exempt:a. To the extent that the system consists of investigatory material compiledfor law enforcement purposes; however, if any individual is denied anyright, privilege, or benefit to which the individual would otherwise beeligible as a result of the maintenance of such material, such materialshall be provided to such individual, except to the extent that the disclosureof such material would reveal the identity of a person who furnished informationto the Government under an express promise that the identity of the personwould be held in confidence, or, prior to the effective date of the Act,under an implied promise that the identity of the person would be heldin confidence; and b. To the extent the system of invetigatory material compiled solely forthe purpose of determining suitability, eligibility, or qualificationsfor Federal civilian employment, military service, Federal contracts, oraccess to classified material, but only to the extent that the disclosureof such material would reveal the identity of a person who furnished informationto the Government under an express promise that the identity of the personwould be held in confidence, or, prior to the effective date of the Act,under an implied promise that the identity of the person would be heldin confidence. This system has been exempted to maintain the efficacy and integrity oflawful investigations conducted pursuant to the responsibilities of theAdministrative Services Division, the Legal Services Staff and the InspectorGeneral in the areas of law enforcement, Federal employment, Governmentcontracts, and access to security classified information.<ITAG tagnum="66">NARA 24 </ITAG>System name:  Personnel Security Files. System classification:  Some of the material contained in the system has been classified in theinterests of the national security pursuant to Executive Order 12356. System location:Personnel security files are maintained in the Personnel Services Division(NAP), 601 D Street, NW., Washington, DC. Records relating to violationsof information security regulations are maintained by the AdministrativeServices Division (NAS), National Archives Building, 7th and PennsylvaniaAvenue, NW., Washington, DC.Categories of individuals covered by the sysem:Individuals covered by the system are employees, applicants for employment,and former employees of NARA. Also included are researchers, experts orconsultants, and employees of contractors performing services under NARAjurisdiction.Categories of records in the system:Personnel security files contain information such as name, date and placeof birth, address, social security number, education, occupation, experience,and investigatory material. Information security files contain recordsof security violations which may include employees' names and positions.Authority for maintenance of the system:Executive Order 10450, as amended; Executive Order 12356; 31 U.S.C. 686;and 40 U.S.C. 318 (a) through (d).Routine uses of records maintained in the system, including categoriesof users and the purposes of such uses:The records in this system of records are used as a basis for issuanceof security and ADP clearance and for recommending administrative actionagainst employees found to be in violation of NARA information securityregulations. The routine use statements A and F, described in the appendixfollowing the NARA notices, also apply to this system of recordsPolicies and practices for storing, retrieving, accessing, retaining, anddisposing of records in the system:Storage:Paper records in file folders and microfiche in cabinets.Retrievability:Paper records are retrieved manually by name from files that are indexedalphabetically and filed numerically by location and incident. Microficherecords are filed alphabetically or by social security number.Safeguards:Records are stored in locked, alarmed room and/or three-way combinationdial safes with access limited to authorized employees. Information isreleased only to officials on a need-to-know basis.Retention and disposal:Disposition of these records is in accordance with the NARA Records Maintenanceand Disposition Manual.System manager(s) and address:The official responsible for the personnel security files is the Directorof Personnel Services (NAP), 601 D Street, NW., Washington, DC (Mailingaddress: National Archives and Records Administration (NAP), Washington,DC 20408). The official responsible for files relating to violations ofinformation security regulations is the Director of Administrative Services(NAS), 7th and Pennsylvania Avenue, NW., Washington, DC.notification procedure:Inquiries by individuals as to whether the system contains a record pertainingto themselves should be addressed to the applicable system manager.record access procedures:Requests from individuals for access to records should be addressed tothe applicable system manager and should include full name (maiden namewhere appropriate), address, and date and place of birth. Only generalinquiries may be made by telephone.contesting record procedures:NARA rules for contesting the contents and appealing initial determinationsare found in 36 CFR Part 1202.record source categories:Individuals, employees, informants, law enforcement agencies, other Governmentagencies, employees references, co-workers, neighbors, educational institutions,and intelligence sources.systems exempted from certain provisions of the act:In accordance with 5 U.S.C. 552a (k)(1), (k)(2), and (k)(5), the personnelsecurity case files in this system of records are exempt from subsections(c)(3); (d); (e)(1); (e)(4) (G), (H), and (I); and (f) of the Privacy Actof 1974, as amended. The system is exempt: a. To the extent that the system consists of investigatory material compliedfor law enforcement purposes; however, if any individual is denied anyright, privilege, or benefit to which the individual would otherwise beeligible as a result of the maintenance of such material, such materialshall be provided to such individual, except to the extent that the disclosureof such material would reveal the identity of a person who furnished informationto the Government under an express promise that the identity of the personwould be held in confidence, or, prior to the effective date of the Act,under an implied promise that the identity of the person would be heldin confidence; andb. To the extent the system consists of investigatory material compiledsolely for the purpose of determining suitability, eligibility, or qualificationsfor Federal civilian employment, military service, Federal contracts, oraccess to classified material, but only to the extent that the disclosureof such material would reveal the indentity of a person who furnished informationto the Government under an express promise that the identity of the personwould be held in confidence, or, prior to the effective date of the Act,under an implied promise that the identity of the person would be heldin confidence.This system has been exempted to maintain the efficacy and integrity oflawful investigations conducted pursuant to the Administrative ServicesDivision's and the Personnel Services Division's responsibilities in theareas of Federal employment, Government contracts, and access to securityclassified information.<ITAG tagnum="84">Appendix</ITAG>The following routine use statements will apply to National Archives andRecords Administration notices where indicated:A. Routine Use-Law Enforcement: In the event that a system of records maintainedby this agency to carry out its functions indicates a violation or potentialviolation of law, whether civil, criminal or regulatory in nature, andwhether arising by general statute or particular program statute, or byregulation, rule or order issued pursuant thereto, the relevant recordsin the system of records, may be referred, as a routine use, to the appropriateagency, whether Federal, State, local, or foreign, charged with the responsibilityof investigating or prosecuting such violation or charged with enforcingor implementing the statute, or rule, regulation or order issued pursuantthereto.B. Routine Use-Disclosure When Requesting Information: A record from thissystem of records may be disclosed as a routine use to a Federal, State,or local agency maintaining civil, criminal or other relevant enforcementinformation or other pertinent information, such as current licenses, ifnecessary, to obtain information relevant to an agency decision concerningthe hiring or retention of an employee, the issuance of a security clearance,the letting of a contract, or the issuance of a license, grant, or otherbenefit.C. Routine Use-Disclosure of Requested Information: A record from thissystem of records may be disclosed to a Federal agency, in response toits request, in connection with the hiring or retention of an employee,the issuance of a security clearance, conducting a security or suitabilityinvestigation, classifying a job, the reporting of an investigation ofan employee, the letting of a contract, or the issuance of a license, grant,or other benefit by the requesting agency, to the extent that the informationis relevant and necessary to the requesting agency's decision on the matter.D. Routine Use-Grievance, Complaint, Appeal: A record from this systemof records may be disclosed to an authorized appeal or grievance examiner,formal complaints examiner, equal employment opportunity investigator,arbitrator, or other duly authorized official engaged in investigationor settlement of a grievance, complaint, or appeal filed by an employee.A record from this system of records may be disclosed to the United StatesOffice of Personnel Management in accordance with its responsibility forevaluation of Fdereal personnel management. To the extent that officialpersonnel records in the custody of NARA are covered within the systemof records published by the Office of Personnel Management as Governmentwiderecords, those records will be considered as a part of that Governmentwidesystem. Other official personnel records covered by notices published byNARA and considered to be separate systems of records may be transferredto the Office of Personnel Management in accordance with official personnelprograms and activities as a routine use.E. Routine Use-Congressional Inquiries: A record from this system of recordsmay be disclosed as a routine use to a Member of Congress or to a Congressionalstaff member in response to an inquiry of the Congressional office madeat the request of the individual about whom the record is maintained.F. Routine Use-NARA Agents: A record from this system of records may bedisclosed as a routine use to an expert, consultant, or a contractor ofNARA to the extent necessary for them to assist NARA in the performanceof its duties.G. Routine Use-Department of Justice/Courts: A record from this systemof records may be disclosed to the Department of Justice or in a proceedingbefore a court or adjudicative body before which NARA is authorized toappear, when: (a) NARA, or any component thereof; or, (b) any employeeof NARA in his or her official capacity; or, (c) any employee of NARA inhis or her individual capacity where the Department of Justice of NARAhas agreed to represent the employee; or (d) the United States, where NARAdetermines that litigation is likely to affect the agency or any of itscomponents, is a party to litigation or has an interest in such litigation,and the use of such records by the Department of Justice or by NARA beforea court or adjudicative body is deemed by NARA to be relevant and necessaryto the litigation, provided, however, that in each case, NARA determinesthat disclosure of the records is a use of the information contained inthe records that is compatible with the purpose for which the records werecollected.H. Routine Use-MSPB, FLRA, and EEOC: Information from this system of recordsmay be disclosed to officials of the Merit Systems Protection Board orFederal Labor Authority, or the Equal Employment Opportunity Commissionwhen requested in performance of their authorized duties.<ITAG tagnum="74">Appendix_Addresses of Locations</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Washington, DC Metropolitan Area Facilities</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">National Archives Building. 7th and Pennsylvania Avenue, NW., Washington,DC. Mailing Address: National Archives and Records Administration, Washington,DC 20408.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">National Audiovisual Center. 8700 Edgeworth Drive, Capitol Heights,MD 20743-3701.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Office of the Federal Register. 1100 L Street, NW., Washington, DC.Mailing Address: National Archives and Records Administration (NF), Washington,DC 20408.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Office of Federal Records Centers. 1730 K Street, NW., Washington,DC. Mailing Address: National Archives and Records Administration (NC),Washington, DC 20408.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Office of Records Administration. 601 D Street, NW., Washington, DC.Mailing Address: National Archives and Records Administration (NI), Washington,DC 20408.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Personnel Services Division. 601 D Street, NW., Washington, DC. MailingAddress: National Archives and Records Administration (NAP), Washington,DC 20408.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Pickett Street Annex. 841-885 South Pickett Street, Alexandria, VA.Mailing Address: National Archives and Records Administration, Washington,DC 20408.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Washington National Records Center. 4205 Suitland Road, Suitland,MD. Mailing Address: Washington National Records Center, Washington, DC20409.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Presidential Libraries</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Herbert Hoover Library, Parkside Drive, West Branch, IA 52358.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Franklin D. Roosevelt Library, 259 Albany Road, Hyde Park, NY 12538.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Harry S. Truman Library, 1200 North McCoy, Independence, MO 64050.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Dwight D. Eisenhower Library, Southeast Fourth Street, Abilene, KS67410.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">John F. Kennedy Library, Columbia Point, Boston, MA 02125.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Lyndon Baines Johnson Library, 2313 Red River Street, Austin, TX 78705.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Gerald R. Ford Library, 1000 Beal Avenue, Ann Arbor, MI 48109-2114.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Gerald R. Ford Museum, 303 Pearl Street, NW., Grand Rapids, MI 49504.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Jimmy Carter Library, One Copenhill Avenue, Atlanta, GA 30307.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Nixon Presidential Materials Project Staff, 845 South Pickett Street,Alexandria, VA. Mailing Address: National Archives and Records Administration(NLNP), Washington, DC 20408.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Reagan Presidential Materials Staff, 9055 Exposition Drive, Los Angeles,CA 90034.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Federal Records Centers and Regional Archives at the Same Location</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">380 Trapelo Road, Waltham, MA 02154.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Building 22, Military Ocean Terminal, Bayonne, NJ 07002-5388.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1557 St. Joseph Avenue, East Point, GA 30344.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">7358 South Pulaski Road, Chicago, IL 60629.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2312 East Bannister Road, Kansas City, MO 64131.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">501 West Felix Street, (Mailing address: P.O. Box 6216), Fort Worth,TX 76115.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Denver Federal Center, Building 48 (Mailing address: P.O. Box 25307),Denver, CO 80225.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1000 Commodore Drive, San Bruno, CA 94066.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">24000 Avila Road, (Mailing address: P.O. Box 6719), Laguna Niguel,CA 92677-6719.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">6125 Sand Point Way, NE., Seattle, WA 98115.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Regional Archives Not Located with Federal Records Center</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">9th and Market Streets, Room 1350, Philadelphia, PA 19107.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Federal Records Centers Not Located with Regional Archives</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5000 Wissahickon Avenue, Philadelphia, PA 19144.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3150 Springboro Road, Dayton, OH 45439.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">National Personnel Records Center, Civilian Personnel Records, 111Winnebago Street, St. Louis, MO 63118.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">National Personnel Records Center, Military Personnel Records, 9700Page Boulevard, St. Louis, MO 63132.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-10986 Filed 5-8-89; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 7515-01-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>